Missouri, session 2026, SB897.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
five new sections, to be known as sections 376.2100, 376.2102,
376.2104, 376.2106, and 376.2108, to read as follows:
376.2100. 1. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 1 of section 376.2108, as used in sections
376.2100 to 376.2108, terms shall have the same meanings as
are ascribed to them under section 376.1350.
2. As used in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108, the term
"evaluation period" shall mean the first six months of the
calendar year or the last six months of the calendar year.
376.2102. 1. A health carrier or utilization review
entity shall not require a health care provider to obtain
prior authorization for a health care service unless the
health carrier or utilization review entity makes a
determination that in the most recent evaluation period the
health carrier or utilization review entity has approved or
would have approved less than ninety percent of the prior
authorization requests submitted by that provider for that
health care service.

SB 897 2
2. A health carrier or utilization review entity shall
not require a health care provider to obtain prior
authorization for any health care services unless the health
carrier or utilization review entity makes a determination
that in the most recent evaluation period the health carrier
or utilization review entity has approved or would have
approved less than ninety percent of all prior authorization
requests submitted by that provider for health care services.
3. In making a determination under this section, the
health carrier or utilization review entity shall not count
any prior authorization requests denied by a health carrier
or utilization review entity and being appealed by the
health care provider but shall count as approved any prior
authorization request that was denied by a health carrier or
utilization review entity but that was subsequently
authorized.
376.2104. 1. The health carrier or utilization review
entity shall notify the health care provider no later than
twenty-five days after the conclusion of the relevant
evaluation period of any determination made under section
376.2102. The notification shall include the statistics,
data, and any supporting documentation for making the
determination for the relevant evaluation period.
2. The health carrier or utilization review entity
shall establish a process for health care providers to
appeal any determinations made under section 376.2102.
3. The health carrier or utilization review entity
shall maintain an online portal to allow health care
providers to access all prior authorization decisions,
including determinations made under section 376.2102. For
health care providers subject to prior authorizations, the
portal shall include the status of each prior authorization

SB 897 3
request, all notifications to the health care provider, the
dates the health care provider received such notifications,
and any other information relevant to the determination.
376.2106. No health carrier or utilization review
entity shall deny or reduce payment to a health care
provider for a health care service for which the provider
has a prior authorization unless the provider:
(1) Knowingly and materially misrepresented the health
care service in a request for payment submitted to the
health carrier or utilization review entity with the
specific intent to deceive and obtain an unlawful payment
from the carrier or entity; or
(2) Failed to substantially perform the health care
service.
376.2108. 1. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to
376.2108 shall not apply to MO HealthNet, except that a
Medicaid managed care organization as defined in section
208.431 shall be considered a health carrier for purposes of
sections 376.2100 to 376.2108.
2. The provisions of sections 376.2100 to 376.2108
shall not apply to health care providers who have not
participated in a health benefit plan offered by the health
carrier for at least one full evaluation period.
3. Nothing in sections 376.2100 to 376.2108 shall be
construed to:
(1) Authorize a health care provider to provide a
health care service outside the scope of his or her
applicable license; or
(2) Require a health carrier or utilization review
entity to pay for a health care service described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
✓